Idaho, session 2026, H0547.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-5810, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5810. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE -- INSTRUCTORS -- APPRENTICES
-- STUDENTS. (1) To qualify for licensure under this chapter, an applicant
for licensure must:
(a) Be at least sixteen and one-half (16 1/2) years of age at the time of
application;
(b) Have completed at least two (2) years of high school or have at-
tained an equivalent education as determined by the board;
(c) Pass an examination for the occupation in which the applicant is
seeking licensure, which examination shall be conducted or approved by
the board; and
(d) Prove to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant has not
engaged in conduct that would constitute grounds for discipline under
section 54-5823, Idaho Code.
(2) Except as otherwise provided, and in addition to the requirements
listed in subsection (1) of this section, an applicant for licensure:
(a) As a barber, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least nine hundred (900) hours in a barber school approved by the
board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours
as an apprentice in an apprenticeship that covered all aspects of
the practice of barbering;
(b) As a barber-stylist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours in a barber school
approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least three thousand (3,000) hours as an appren-
tice in an apprenticeship that covered all aspects of the practice
of barber-styling;
(c) As a cosmetologist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least one thousand six hundred (1,600) one thousand (1,000) hours
in a cosmetology school approved by the board; or


(ii) Completed at least three thousand two hundred (3,200) two
thousand (2,000) hours as an apprentice in an apprenticeship that
covered all aspects of the practice of cosmetology;
(d) As an electrologist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least six hundred (600) hours in a school approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours as
an apprentice in a cosmetology establishment under the direct per-
sonal supervision of a licensed electrologist instructor;
(e) As an esthetician, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least six hundred (600) hours in a school approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours
as an apprentice in a cosmetology establishment under the direct
personal supervision of a licensed cosmetology instructor. Such
establishment must have at least one (1) licensed esthetician
on-site in accordance with board rules; and
(f) As a nail technician, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least four hundred (400) hours in a school approved by the board;
or
(ii) Completed at least eight hundred (800) hours as an apprentice
in a cosmetology establishment under the direct personal super-
vision of a licensed cosmetology instructor. Such establishment
shall have at least one (1) licensed nail technician on-site in ac-
cordance with board rules.
(3) To qualify as an instructor of barbering, barber-styling, cosme-
tology, electrology, esthetics, or nail technology, an applicant must:
(a) Hold a current license in the profession or closely related profes-
sion, as determined by the board, for which the applicant seeks to in-
struct;
(b) Have worked for at least five (5) of the last seven (7) years as a li-
censed barber, barber-stylist, cosmetologist, electrologist, estheti-
cian, or nail technician, or have satisfactorily completed:
(i) A minimum six (6) month teacher's course of instruction in one
(1) of the specialties described in this subsection; or
(ii) A minimum three (3) month teacher's course of instruction in
a school of one (1) of the specialties described in this subsec-
tion, if the applicant has at least two (2) years of experience as
a licensee in one (1) of the specialties described in this subsec-
tion; and
(c) Have completed twelve (12) college credit hours or equivalent edu-
cation, as determined by the board, or pass an examination approved by
the board.
(4) To be qualified to hold an apprenticeship for purposes of this chap-
ter, a person must:
(a) Meet the qualifications set forth in paragraphs (a), (b), and (d) of
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Be registered as an apprentice with the board.


(5) To be considered a student for purposes of this chapter, a person
must:
(a) Meet the qualifications set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection
(1) of this section; and
(b) Be registered as a student in a licensed barber school or cosmetol-
ogy school.
(6) A high school student enrolled in a licensed school may be under
sixteen and one-half (16 1/2) years of age while accruing the course of in-
struction hours required for licensure.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.